Illinois, session 104th, SB1979.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Employment Security Law of 5the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding 6Section 1005-170 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 1005/1005-170 new)8    Sec. 1005-170. Self-employment assistance program. The 9Department of Employment Security shall create a 10self-employment assistance program to provide benefits to 11individuals who are working to start a business in this State 12and who are otherwise eligible to receive benefits under the 13Unemployment Insurance Act. A participant in the program shall 14be deemed to be actively engaged in seeking work as required 15under paragraph (5) of subsection (K) of Section 409 of the 16Unemployment Insurance Act. Except as provided in this 17Section, benefits paid to a participant in the program are 18considered to be benefits paid under the Unemployment 19Insurance Act. The Department of Employment Security shall 20adopt rules to implement and administer this Section.